Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-23] Who liable; amount. In
addition to the amount of tax determined to be due under this chapter, every
person who fails or refuses to perform, within a reasonable time, any duty
required by this chapter, or who fails or refuses to make and deliver within a
reasonable time any statement or record required by this chapter, shall forfeit
to the State the additional sum of $10,000, to be recovered in an action
brought by the attorney general in the name of the State. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next